Maryland, session 2025, SB0737.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Public Utilities
7–103.
(a) An electric company incorporated in Maryland may:
(1) manufacture, sell, and furnish electric power in any municipal
corporation or county of the State;
(2) construct a power line to transmit power under, along, on, or over the
roadways or public ways of any municipal corporation or county of the State; and
(3) connect the power line from the place of supply to any other structure
or object.
(b) (1) An electric company must have the consent of the governing body of the
municipal corporation or county before laying or constructing any power line in accordance
with subsection (a) of this section.
(2) The governing body of the municipal corporation or county may adopt
reasonable regulations and conditions for the laying of a power line, including regulations
requiring the electric company to refill and repave any roadway or public way under which
the power line is laid.
(C) AN ELECTRIC COMPANY MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF
CONDEMNATION TO ACQUIRE PROPERTY FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A POWER LINE
IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS SECTION.
7–207.
(b) (1) (i) Unless a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, a person may not begin construction in
the State of:
1. a generating station; or

SENATE BILL 737 3
2. a qualified generator lead line.
(ii) If a person obtains Commission approval for construction under
§ 7–207.1 of this subtitle, the Commission shall exempt a person from the requirement to
obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity under this section.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph, a person
may not apply to obtain a certificate of public convenience and necessity for construction of
a qualified generator lead line unless:
1. at least 90 days before the filing of an application for a
certificate of public convenience and necessity, the person had in good faith offered the
electric company that owns that portion of the electric grid in Maryland to which the
qualified generator lead line would interconnect a full and fair opportunity for the electric
company to construct the qualified generator lead line; and
2. at any time at least 10 days before the filing of an
application for a certificate of public convenience and necessity, the electric company:
A. did not accept from the person a proposal or a negotiated
version of the proposal under which the electric company would construct the qualified
generator lead line; or
B. stated in writing that the electric company did not intend
to construct the qualified generator lead line.
(2) (I) [Unless] EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF
THIS PARAGRAPH, UNLESS a certificate of public convenience and necessity for the
construction is first obtained from the Commission, and the Commission has found that the
capacity is necessary to ensure a sufficient supply of electricity to customers in the State, a
person may not exercise a right of condemnation in connection with the construction of a
generating station.
(II) A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION
TO ACQUIRE PROPERTY FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONSTRUCTING A GENERATING
STATION THAT PRODUCES ELECTRICITY FROM WIND ENERGY OR SOLAR ENERGY.
(3) (i) Except as provided in paragraph (4) of this subsection, unless a
certificate of public convenience and necessity for the construction is first obtained from the
Commission, a person may not begin construction of an overhead transmission line that is
designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts [or exercise a right of condemnation
with the construction].

SENATE BILL 737
(ii) For construction related to an existing overhead transmission
line, the Commission may waive the requirement in subparagraph (i) of this paragraph for
good cause.
(iii) Notwithstanding subparagraph (i) of this paragraph and subject
to subparagraph (iv) of this paragraph, the Commission may issue a certificate of public
convenience and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line only if the
applicant for the certificate of public convenience and necessity:
1. is an electric company; or
2. is or, on the start of commercial operation of the overhead
transmission line, will be subject to regulation as a public utility by an officer or an agency
of the United States.
(iv) The Commission may not issue a certificate of public convenience
and necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line in the electric
distribution service territory of an electric company to an applicant other than an electric
company if:
1. the overhead transmission line is to be located solely
within the electric distribution service territory of that electric company; and
2. the cost of the overhead transmission line is to be paid
solely by that electric company and its ratepayers.
[(v) 1. This subparagraph applies to the construction of an
overhead transmission line for which a certificate of public convenience and necessity is
required under this section.
2. On issuance of a certificate of public convenience and
necessity for the construction of an overhead transmission line, a person may acquire by
condemnation, in accordance with Title 12 of the Real Property Article, any property or
right necessary for the construction or maintenance of the transmission line.]
(4) (i) Except as provided in subparagraph (ii) of this paragraph, for
construction related to an existing overhead transmission line designed to carry a voltage
in excess of 69,000 volts, the Commission shall waive the requirement to obtain a certificate
of public convenience and necessity if the Commission finds that the construction does not[:
1. require the person to obtain new real property or
additional rights–of–way through eminent domain; or
2.] require larger or higher structures to accommodate:
[A.] 1. increased voltage; or

SENATE BILL 737 5
[B.] 2. larger conductors.
(ii) 1. For construction related to an existing overhead
transmission line, including repairs, that is necessary to avoid an imminent safety hazard
or reliability risk, a person may undertake the necessary construction.
2. Within 30 days after construction is completed under
subsubparagraph 1 of this subparagraph, a person shall file a report with the Commission
describing the work that was completed.
7–207.1.
(b) This section applies to a person who:
(1) constructs a generating station:
(i) designed to provide on–site generated electricity if:
1. the capacity of the generating station does not exceed 70
megawatts; and
2. the electricity that may be exported for sale from the
generating station to the electric system is sold only on the wholesale market pursuant to
an interconnection, operation, and maintenance agreement with the local electric company;
or
(ii) that produces electricity from wind if:
1. the generating station is land–based;
2. the capacity of the generating station does not exceed 70
megawatts;
3. the electricity that may be exported for sale from the
generating station to the electric system is sold only on the wholesale market pursuant to
an interconnection, operation, and maintenance agreement with the local electric company;
4. the Commission provides an opportunity for public
comment at a public hearing as provided in subsection (g) of this section; and
5. the generating station’s wind turbines are not located
within a distance from the Patuxent River Naval Air Station that is determined by
regulations adopted by the Commission in coordination with the Commander, Naval Air
Warfare Center Aircraft Division, provided that the distance requirement under the
regulation is:

SENATE BILL 737
A. not greater than is necessary to encompass an area in
which utility scale wind turbines could create Doppler radar interference for missions at
the Patuxent River Naval Air Station;
B. not greater than 46 miles, measured from location
38.29667N, 76.37668W; and
C. subject to modification if necessary to reflect changes in
missions or technology at the Patuxent River Naval Air Station or changes in wind energy
technology; or
(2) constructs a generating station if:
(i) the capacity of the generating station does not exceed 25
megawatts;
(ii) the electricity that may be exported for sale from the generating
station to the electric system is sold only on the wholesale market pursuant to an
interconnection, operation, and maintenance agreement with the local electric company;
and
(iii) at least 10% of the electricity generated at the generating station
each year is consumed on–site.
(H) A PERSON MAY NOT EXERCISE A RIGHT OF CONDEMNATION TO ACQUIRE
PROPERTY FOR THE PURPOSE OF CONSTRUCTING A GENERATING STATION UNDER
THIS SECTION THAT PRODUCES ELECTRICITY FROM WIND ENERGY OR SOLAR
ENERGY.
7–208.
(b) This section applies to any person:
(1) constructing a generating station and its associated overhead
transmission lines designed to carry a voltage in excess of 69,000 volts; OR
(2) [exercising the right of condemnation in connection with the
construction; or
(3)] constructing a qualified submerged renewable energy line.
Article – Real Property
10–705.
(a) (1) In this section the following words have the meanings indicated.

SENATE BILL 737 7
(2) “Conservation easement” means an easement, covenant, restriction, or
condition on real property, including an amendment to an easement, covenant, restriction,
or condition, as provided for in § 2–118 of this article that is:
(i) Owned by:
1. The Maryland Environmental Trust;
2. The Maryland Historical Trust;
3. The Maryland Agricultural Land Preservation
Foundation;
4. The Maryland Department of Natural Resources;
5. A county or municipal corporation and is funded by the
Maryland Department of Natural Resources, the Rural Legacy Program, or a local
agricultural preservation program; or
6. A land trust; or
(ii) Required by a permit issued by the Department of the
Environment.
12–101.
(a) All proceedings for the acquisition of private property for public use by
condemnation are governed by the provisions of this title and of Title 12, Chapter 200 of
the Maryland Rules.
(E) NOTWITHSTANDING ANY OTHER LAW, THE STATE OR ANY OF ITS
INSTRUMENTALITIES OR POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS MAY NOT ACQUIRE BY
CONDEMNATION A PROPERTY THAT:
(1) IS ENCUMBERED BY A CONSERVATION EASEMENT AS DEFINED
UNDER § 10–705(A) OF THIS ARTICLE; OR
(2) WILL BE USED FOR THE CONSTRUCTION OF A POWER LINE OR A
GENERATING STATION THAT PRODUCES ELECTRICITY FROM WIND ENERGY OR
SOLAR ENERGY.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2025.